Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-902
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Prepaid Wireless Surcharge Act:

(1) Consumer means a person who purchases prepaid wireless telecommunications service in a retail transaction;

(2) Prepaid wireless surcharge means the charge that is required to be collected by a seller from a consumer in the amount established under section 86-903;

(3) Prepaid wireless telecommunications service means a wireless telecommunications service that allows a caller to dial 911 to access the 911 system, which service must be paid for in advance and is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount or expiration of time;

(4) Provider means a person that provides prepaid wireless telecommunications service pursuant to a license issued by the Federal Communications Commission;

(5) Retail transaction means the purchase of prepaid wireless telecommunications service from a seller for any purpose other than resale;

(6) Seller means a person who sells prepaid wireless telecommunications service to another person; and

(7) Wireless telecommunications service means mobile service as defined by 47 C.F.R. 20.3, as such section existed on July 19, 2012.

Laws 2012, LB1091, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB157, § 5.